West Virginia, session 2025, HB2546.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. THE GOVERNOR. §5-1-25. Designation of daylight saving time as official time; designating Eastern Standard Time as official time beginning July 1, 2025. (a) Daylight saving time shall be the statewide official time, commencing at two o'clock antemeridian on the second Sunday of March and terminating at two o'clock antemeridian on the first Sunday of November; this time shall apply to all public schools, institutions of higher learning, agencies, departments, and political subdivisions of the state.(b) Beginning on and after July 1, 2025, Eastern Standard Time shall be the statewide official time, commencing at two o'clock antemeridian; this time shall apply to all public schools, institutions of higher learning, agencies, departments and political subdivisions of the state.(c) Beginning on and after July 1, 2025, the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall no longer be in effect and any reference to daylight saving time in this code shall be construed to mean Eastern Standard Time.